Washington statutes.
RCW 19.36.100

"Credit agreement" defined.

"Credit agreement" means an agreement, promise, or commitment to lend money, to otherwise extend credit, to forbear with respect to the repayment of any debt or the exercise of any remedy, to modify or amend the terms under which the creditor has lent money or otherwise extended credit, to release any guarantor or cosigner, or to make any other financial accommodation pertaining to a debt or other extension of credit.

[ 2000 c 171 s 53; 1990 c 211 s 1.]